Hawaii statutes.
§502-53 No certificate of acknowledgment
contrary hereto valid in court or entitled to be recorded; exception. No
certificate of acknowledgment contrary to this chapter is valid in any court of
the State, nor is it entitled to be recorded in the bureau of conveyances, but
no certificate of acknowledgment executed before July 29, 1872, shall in
consequence of anything in this chapter contained be deemed invalid. [L 1909, c
69, §9; RL 1925, §3158; RL 1935, §5144; RL 1945, §12744; RL 1955, §343-37; HRS
§502-53]

Case Notes

Cited: 26 H. 121, 123.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next